Illinois, session 104th, HB3170.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 521B-10, 21B-20, 21B-30, 21B-35, and 21B-105 and by adding 6Sections 21B-32 and 21B-47 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/21B-10)8    Sec. 21B-10. State Educator Preparation and Licensure 9Board.10    (a) The State Teacher Certification Board, which had been 11established under Section 21-13 of the School Code prior to 12this amendatory Act of the 97th General Assembly, shall be 13renamed the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 14References in law to the State Teacher Certification Board 15shall mean the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. 16The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board shall 17consist of the State Superintendent of Education or a 18representative appointed by him or her, who shall be 19ex-officio chairperson, 5 administrative or faculty members of 20public or private colleges or universities located in this 21State, 5 administrative or faculty members of public community 22colleges located in this State, 3 administrators and 10 23classroom teachers employed in the public schools (5 of whom   HB3170- 2 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1must be members of and nominated by a statewide professional 2teachers' organization and 5 of whom must be members of and 3nominated by a different statewide professional teachers' 4organization), and one regional superintendent of schools, all 5of whom shall be appointed by the State Board of Education; 6provided that at least one of the administrators and at least 3 7of the classroom teachers so appointed must be employees of a 8school district that is subject to the provisions of Article 934 of this Code. A statewide professional teachers' 10organization and a different statewide professional teachers' 11organization shall submit to the State Board of Education for 12consideration at least 3 names of accomplished teachers for 13every one vacancy or expiring term in a classroom teacher 14position. The nominations submitted to the State Board of 15Education under this Section to fill a vacancy or an expiring 16term shall be advisory. Nomination for State Educator 17Preparation and Licensure Board members must be submitted to 18the State Board of Education within 30 days after the vacancy 19or vacancies occur. Nominations to fill an expiring term must 20be submitted to the State Superintendent of Education State 21Board of Education at least 30 days before the expiration of 22that term. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this 23Section, if a sufficient number of nominations are not 24received by the State Superintendent of Education State Board 25of Education for a vacancy or expiring term within the 30-day 26period, then the State Superintendent of Education State Board   HB3170- 3 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1of Education may appoint any qualified person, in the same 2manner as the original appointment, to fill the vacancy or 3expiring term. The regular term of each member is 3 years, and 4an individual may be appointed for no more than 2 consecutive 5terms. The term of an appointed member of the State Educator 6Preparation and Licensure Board shall expire on June 30 of his 7or her final year.8    The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board may 9allow one member representing the Board of Higher Education 10and one member representing the Illinois Community College 11Board to serve as nonvoting, ex officio members on the Board. 12    (b) The State Board of Education shall appoint a secretary 13of the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.14    (c) The State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board 15shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly and such other 16special meetings as may be necessary.17    (d) The necessary expenses of the State Educator 18Preparation and Licensure Board shall be provided through the 19State Board of Education. The State Board of Education, in 20consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 21Board, may adopt such rules as may be necessary for the 22administration of this Article.23    (e) (Blank).24(Source: P.A. 100-596, eff. 7-1-18.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/21B-20)  HB3170- 4 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    Sec. 21B-20. Types of licenses. The State Board of 2Education shall implement a system of educator licensure, 3whereby individuals employed in school districts who are 4required to be licensed must have one of the following 5licenses: (i) a professional educator license; (ii) an 6educator license with stipulations; (iii) a substitute 7teaching license; or (iv) until June 30, 2028, a short-term 8substitute teaching license. References in law regarding 9individuals certified or certificated or required to be 10certified or certificated under Article 21 of this Code shall 11also include individuals licensed or required to be licensed 12under this Article. The first year of all licenses ends on June 1330 following one full year of the license being issued.14    The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 15State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 16rules as may be necessary to govern the requirements for 17licenses and endorsements under this Section. 18        (1) Professional Educator License. Persons who (i) 19    have successfully completed an approved educator 20    preparation program and are recommended for licensure by 21    the Illinois institution offering the educator preparation 22    program, (ii) have successfully completed the required 23    testing under Section 21B-30 of this Code, (iii) until 24    July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised test for a 25    particular content area is implemented, whichever is 26    later, have successfully completed coursework on the   HB3170- 5 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    psychology of, the identification of, and the methods of 2    instruction for the exceptional child, including, without 3    limitation, children with learning disabilities, (iv) have 4    successfully completed coursework in methods of reading 5    and reading in the content area, and (v) have met all other 6    criteria established by rule of the State Board of 7    Education shall be issued a Professional Educator License. 8    Persons seeking a Professional Educator License with a 9    School support personnel endorsement or chief school 10    business official endorsement are exempt from the 11    requirements in items (iii) and (iv). All Professional 12    Educator Licenses are valid until June 30 immediately 13    following 5 years of the license being issued. The 14    Professional Educator License shall be endorsed with 15    specific areas and grade levels in which the individual is 16    eligible to practice. For an early childhood education 17    endorsement, an individual may satisfy the student 18    teaching requirement of his or her early childhood teacher 19    preparation program through placement in a setting with 20    children from birth through grade 2, and the individual 21    may be paid and receive credit while student teaching. The 22    student teaching experience must meet the requirements of 23    and be approved by the individual's early childhood 24    teacher preparation program.25        Individuals can receive subsequent endorsements on the 26    Professional Educator License. Subsequent endorsements   HB3170- 6 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    shall require a minimum of 24 semester hours of coursework 2    in the endorsement area and passage of the applicable 3    content area test, unless otherwise specified by rule.4        (2) Educator License with Stipulations. An Educator 5    License with Stipulations shall be issued an endorsement 6    that limits the license holder to one particular position 7    or does not require completion of an approved educator 8    program or both.9        An individual with an Educator License with 10    Stipulations must not be employed by a school district or 11    any other entity to replace any presently employed teacher 12    who otherwise would not be replaced for any reason.13        An Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 14    with the following endorsements:15            (A) (Blank). 16            (B) Alternative provisional educator. An 17        alternative provisional educator endorsement on an 18        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued to an 19        applicant who, at the time of applying for the 20        endorsement, has done all of the following:21                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 22            college or university with a minimum of a 23            bachelor's degree.24                (ii) Successfully completed the first phase of 25            the Alternative Educator Licensure Program for 26            Teachers, as described in Section 21B-50 of this   HB3170- 7 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1            Code.2                (iii) Passed a content area test, as required 3            under Section 21B-30 of this Code.4        The alternative provisional educator endorsement is 5    valid for 2 years of teaching and may be renewed for a 6    third year by an individual meeting the requirements set 7    forth in Section 21B-50 of this Code. 8            (C) Alternative provisional superintendent. An 9        alternative provisional superintendent endorsement on 10        an Educator License with Stipulations entitles the 11        holder to serve only as a superintendent or assistant 12        superintendent in a school district's central office. 13        This endorsement may only be issued to an applicant 14        who, at the time of applying for the endorsement, has 15        done all of the following:16                (i) Graduated from a regionally accredited 17            college or university with a minimum of a master's 18            degree in a management field other than education.19                (ii) Been employed for a period of at least 5 20            years in a management level position in a field 21            other than education.22                (iii) Successfully completed the first phase 23            of an alternative route to superintendent 24            endorsement program, as provided in Section 21B-55 25            of this Code.26                (iv) Passed a content area test required under   HB3170- 8 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1            Section 21B-30 of this Code.2            The endorsement is valid for 2 fiscal years in 3        order to complete one full year of serving as a 4        superintendent or assistant superintendent.5            (D) (Blank).6            (E) Career and technical educator. A career and 7        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 8        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 9        has a minimum of 60 semester hours of coursework from a 10        regionally accredited institution of higher education 11        or an accredited trade and technical institution and 12        has a minimum of 2,000 hours of experience outside of 13        education in each area to be taught.14            The career and technical educator endorsement on 15        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 16        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 17        endorsement being issued and may be renewed.18            An individual who holds a valid career and 19        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 20        with Stipulations but does not hold a bachelor's 21        degree may substitute teach in career and technical 22        education classrooms. 23            An individual who holds a valid career and 24        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 25        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 26        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional   HB3170- 9 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        Educator License. 2            (F) (Blank).3            (G) Transitional bilingual educator. A 4        transitional bilingual educator endorsement on an 5        Educator License with Stipulations may be issued for 6        the purpose of providing instruction in accordance 7        with Article 14C of this Code to an applicant who 8        provides satisfactory evidence that he or she meets 9        all of the following requirements:10                (i) Possesses adequate speaking, reading, and 11            writing ability in the language other than English 12            in which transitional bilingual education is 13            offered.14                (ii) Has the ability to successfully 15            communicate in English.16                (iii) Either possessed, within 5 years 17            previous to his or her applying for a transitional 18            bilingual educator endorsement, a valid and 19            comparable teaching certificate or comparable 20            authorization issued by a foreign country or holds 21            a degree from an institution of higher learning in 22            a foreign country that the State Educator 23            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 24            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 25            regionally accredited institution of higher 26            learning in the United States.  HB3170- 10 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1            A transitional bilingual educator endorsement 2        shall be valid for prekindergarten through grade 12, 3        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 4        of the endorsement being issued, and shall not be 5        renewed.6            Persons holding a transitional bilingual educator 7        endorsement shall not be employed to replace any 8        presently employed teacher who otherwise would not be 9        replaced for any reason. 10            (H) Language endorsement. In an effort to 11        alleviate the shortage of teachers speaking a language 12        other than English in the public schools, an 13        individual who holds an Educator License with 14        Stipulations may also apply for a language 15        endorsement, provided that the applicant provides 16        satisfactory evidence that he or she meets all of the 17        following requirements:18                (i) Holds a transitional bilingual 19            endorsement. 20                (ii) Has demonstrated proficiency in the 21            language for which the endorsement is to be issued 22            by passing the applicable language content test 23            required by the State Board of Education.24                (iii) Holds a bachelor's degree or higher from 25            a regionally accredited institution of higher 26            education or, for individuals educated in a   HB3170- 11 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1            country other than the United States, holds a 2            degree from an institution of higher learning in a 3            foreign country that the State Educator 4            Preparation and Licensure Board determines to be 5            the equivalent of a bachelor's degree from a 6            regionally accredited institution of higher 7            learning in the United States.8                (iv) (Blank).9            A language endorsement on an Educator License with 10        Stipulations is valid for prekindergarten through 11        grade 12 for the same validity period as the 12        individual's transitional bilingual educator 13        endorsement on the Educator License with Stipulations 14        and shall not be renewed.15            (I) Visiting international educator. A visiting 16        international educator endorsement on an Educator 17        License with Stipulations may be issued to an 18        individual who is being recruited by a particular 19        school district that conducts formal recruitment 20        programs outside of the United States to secure the 21        services of qualified teachers and who meets all of 22        the following requirements:23                (i) Holds the equivalent of a minimum of a 24            bachelor's degree issued in the United States.25                (ii) Has been prepared as a teacher at the 26            grade level for which he or she will be employed.  HB3170- 12 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1                (iii) Has adequate content knowledge in the 2            subject to be taught.3                (iv) Has an adequate command of the English 4            language.5            A holder of a visiting international educator 6        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 7        shall be permitted to teach in bilingual education 8        programs in the language that was the medium of 9        instruction in his or her teacher preparation program, 10        provided that he or she passes the English Language 11        Proficiency Examination or another test of writing 12        skills in English identified by the State Board of 13        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 14        Preparation and Licensure Board.15            A visiting international educator endorsement on 16        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid for 5 17        years and shall not be renewed.18            (J) Paraprofessional educator. A paraprofessional 19        educator endorsement on an Educator License with 20        Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who holds a 21        high school diploma or its recognized equivalent and 22        (i) holds an associate's degree or a minimum of 60 23        semester hours of credit from a regionally accredited 24        institution of higher education; (ii) has passed a 25        paraprofessional competency test under subsection 26        (c-5) of Section 21B-30; or (iii) is at least 18 years   HB3170- 13 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        of age and will be using the Educator License with 2        Stipulations exclusively for grades prekindergarten 3        through grade 8, until the individual reaches the age 4        of 19 years and otherwise meets the criteria for a 5        paraprofessional educator endorsement pursuant to this 6        subparagraph (J). The paraprofessional educator 7        endorsement is valid until June 30 immediately 8        following 5 years of the endorsement being issued and 9        may be renewed through application and payment of the 10        appropriate fee, as required under Section 21B-40 of 11        this Code. An individual who holds only a 12        paraprofessional educator endorsement is not subject 13        to additional requirements in order to renew the 14        endorsement.15            (K) Chief school business official. A chief school 16        business official endorsement on an Educator License 17        with Stipulations may be issued to an applicant who 18        qualifies by having a master's degree or higher, 2 19        years of full-time administrative experience in school 20        business management or 2 years of university-approved 21        practical experience, and a minimum of 24 semester 22        hours of graduate credit in a program approved by the 23        State Board of Education for the preparation of school 24        business administrators and by passage of the 25        applicable State tests, including an applicable 26        content area test.   HB3170- 14 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1            The chief school business official endorsement may 2        also be affixed to the Educator License with 3        Stipulations of any holder who qualifies by having a 4        master's degree in business administration, finance, 5        accounting, or public administration and who completes 6        an additional 6 semester hours of internship in school 7        business management from a regionally accredited 8        institution of higher education and passes the 9        applicable State tests, including an applicable 10        content area test. This endorsement shall be required 11        for any individual employed as a chief school business 12        official. 13            The chief school business official endorsement on 14        an Educator License with Stipulations is valid until 15        June 30 immediately following 5 years of the 16        endorsement being issued and may be renewed if the 17        license holder completes renewal requirements as 18        required for individuals who hold a Professional 19        Educator License endorsed for chief school business 20        official under Section 21B-45 of this Code and such 21        rules as may be adopted by the State Board of 22        Education. 23            The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 24        necessary to implement Public Act 100-288.25            (L) Provisional in-state educator. A provisional 26        in-state educator endorsement on an Educator License   HB3170- 15 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        with Stipulations may be issued to a candidate who has 2        completed an Illinois-approved educator preparation 3        program at an Illinois institution of higher education 4        and who has not successfully completed an 5        evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness but 6        who meets all of the following requirements: 7                (i) Holds at least a bachelor's degree.8                (ii) Has completed an approved educator 9            preparation program at an Illinois institution.10                (iii) Has passed an applicable content area 11            test, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code.12                (iv) Has attempted an evidence-based 13            assessment of teacher effectiveness and received a 14            minimum score on that assessment, as established 15            by the State Board of Education in consultation 16            with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 17            Board.18            A provisional in-state educator endorsement on an 19        Educator License with Stipulations is valid for one 20        full fiscal year after the date of issuance and may not 21        be renewed.22            (M) (Blank).23            (N) Specialized services. A specialized services 24        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 25        may be issued as defined and specified by rule. 26            (O) Provisional career and technical educator. A   HB3170- 16 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        provisional career and technical educator endorsement 2        on an Educator License with Stipulations may be issued 3        to an applicant who has a minimum of 8,000 hours of 4        work experience in the skill for which the applicant 5        is seeking the endorsement. Each employing school 6        board and regional office of education shall provide 7        verification, in writing, to the State Superintendent 8        of Education at the time the application is submitted 9        that no qualified teacher holding a Professional 10        Educator License or an Educator License with 11        Stipulations with a career and technical educator 12        endorsement is available to teach and that actual 13        circumstances require such issuance.14            A provisional career and technical educator 15        endorsement on an Educator License with Stipulations 16        is valid until June 30 immediately following 5 years 17        of the endorsement being issued and may be renewed.18            An individual who holds a provisional career and 19        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 20        with Stipulations may teach as a substitute teacher in 21        career and technical education classrooms. 22            An individual who holds a provisional career and 23        technical educator endorsement on an Educator License 24        with Stipulations is entitled to all of the rights and 25        privileges granted to a holder of a Professional 26        Educator License.   HB3170- 17 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        (3) Substitute Teaching License. A Substitute Teaching 2    License may be issued to qualified applicants for 3    substitute teaching in all grades of the public schools, 4    prekindergarten through grade 12. Substitute Teaching 5    Licenses are not eligible for endorsements. Applicants for 6    a Substitute Teaching License must hold a bachelor's 7    degree or higher from a regionally accredited institution 8    of higher education or must be enrolled in an approved 9    educator preparation program in this State and have earned 10    at least 90 credit hours.11        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 5 years.12        Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for substitute 13    teaching in every county of this State. If an individual 14    has had his or her Professional Educator License or 15    Educator License with Stipulations suspended or revoked, 16    then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 17    Substitute Teaching License.18        A substitute teacher may only teach in the place of a 19    licensed teacher who is under contract with the employing 20    board. If, however, there is no licensed teacher under 21    contract because of an emergency situation, then a 22    district may employ a substitute teacher for no longer 23    than 30 calendar days per each vacant position in the 24    district if the district notifies the appropriate regional 25    office of education within 5 business days after the 26    employment of the substitute teacher in that vacant   HB3170- 18 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    position. A district may continue to employ that same 2    substitute teacher in that same vacant position for 90 3    calendar days or until the end of the semester, whichever 4    is greater, if, prior to the expiration of the 5    30-calendar-day period then current, the district files a 6    written request with the appropriate regional office of 7    education for a 30-calendar-day extension on the basis 8    that the position remains vacant and the district 9    continues to actively seek qualified candidates and 10    provides documentation that it has provided training 11    specific to the position, including training on meeting 12    the needs of students with disabilities and English 13    learners if applicable. Each extension request shall be 14    granted in writing by the regional office of education. An 15    emergency situation is one in which an unforeseen vacancy 16    has occurred and (i) a teacher is unexpectedly unable to 17    fulfill his or her contractual duties or (ii) teacher 18    capacity needs of the district exceed previous indications 19    or vacancies are unfilled due to a lack of qualified 20    candidates, and the district is actively engaged in 21    advertising to hire a fully licensed teacher for the 22    vacant position.23        There is no limit on the number of days that a 24    substitute teacher may teach in a single school district, 25    provided that no substitute teacher may teach for longer 26    than 120 days beginning with the 2021-2022 school year   HB3170- 19 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    through the 2022-2023 school year, otherwise 90 school 2    days for any one licensed teacher under contract in the 3    same school year. A substitute teacher who holds a 4    Professional Educator License or Educator License with 5    Stipulations shall not teach for more than 120 school days 6    for any one licensed teacher under contract in the same 7    school year. The limitations in this paragraph (3) on the 8    number of days a substitute teacher may be employed do not 9    apply to any school district operating under Article 34 of 10    this Code.11        A school district may not require an individual who 12    holds a valid Professional Educator License or Educator 13    License with Stipulations to seek or hold a Substitute 14    Teaching License to teach as a substitute teacher. 15        (4) Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. Beginning 16    on July 1, 2018 and until June 30, 2028, applicants may 17    apply to the State Board of Education for issuance of a 18    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License. A Short-Term 19    Substitute Teaching License may be issued to a qualified 20    applicant for substitute teaching in all grades of the 21    public schools, prekindergarten through grade 12. 22    Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are not eligible 23    for endorsements. Applicants for a Short-Term Substitute 24    Teaching License must hold an associate's degree or have 25    completed at least 60 credit hours from a regionally 26    accredited institution of higher education.  HB3170- 20 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses are valid for 2    substitute teaching in every county of this State. If an 3    individual has had his or her Professional Educator 4    License or Educator License with Stipulations suspended or 5    revoked, then that individual is not eligible to obtain a 6    Short-Term Substitute Teaching License.7        The provisions of Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this 8    Code apply to short-term substitute teachers. 9        An individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 10    License may teach no more than 15 consecutive days per 11    licensed teacher who is under contract. For teacher 12    absences lasting 6 or more days per licensed teacher who 13    is under contract, a school district may not hire an 14    individual holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching 15    License, unless the Governor has declared a disaster due 16    to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 17    Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. An individual 18    holding a Short-Term Substitute Teaching License must 19    complete the training program under Section 10-20.67 or 20    34-18.60 of this Code to be eligible to teach at a public 21    school. Short-Term Substitute Teaching Licenses under this 22    Section are valid for 5 years. 23(Source: P.A. 102-711, eff. 1-1-23; 102-712, eff. 4-27-22; 24102-713, eff. 1-1-23; 102-717, eff. 4-29-22; 102-894, eff. 255-20-22; 103-111, eff. 6-29-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 26103-193, eff. 1-1-24; 103-564, eff. 11-17-23; 103-617, eff.   HB3170- 21 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b17-1-24.) 2    (105 ILCS 5/21B-30)3    Sec. 21B-30. Educator testing.4    (a) (Blank).5    (b) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 6State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall design 7and implement a system of examinations, which shall be 8required prior to the issuance of educator licenses. These 9examinations and indicators must be based on national and 10State professional teaching standards, as determined by the 11State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 12Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. By July 1, 2027, the 13State Superintendent of Education shall begin incorporating 14the following topics into revised examinations for individuals 15seeking a Professional Educator License endorsed in teaching 16or administration, excluding a chief school business official 17endorsement: (i) methods of instruction of the exceptional 18child; (ii) methods of reading and reading in the content 19area; and (iii) instructional strategies for English learners. 20The State Board of Education may adopt such rules as may be 21necessary to implement and administer this Section.22    (c) (Blank).23    (c-5) The State Board must adopt rules to implement a 24paraprofessional competency test. This test would allow an 25applicant seeking an Educator License with Stipulations with a   HB3170- 22 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1paraprofessional educator endorsement to obtain the 2endorsement if he or she passes the test and meets the other 3requirements of subparagraph (J) of paragraph (2) of Section 421B-20 other than the higher education requirements. 5    (d) All applicants seeking a State license shall be 6required to pass a test of content area knowledge for each area 7of endorsement for which there is an applicable test. There 8shall be no exception to this requirement except for an 9applicant seeking a school support personnel endorsement who 10holds an active and valid professional license issued by the 11Department of Financial and Professional Regulation in the 12same subject matter as the endorsement sought, as specified by 13rule by the State Board, or as provided under subparagraph (P) 14of paragraph (1) of Section 21B-20. No candidate may be 15allowed to student teach or serve as the teacher of record 16until he or she has passed the applicable content area test.17    (d-5) The State Board shall consult with any applicable 18vendors within 90 days after July 28, 2023 (the effective date 19of Public Act 103-402) to develop a plan to transition the test 20of content area knowledge in the endorsement area of 21elementary education, grades one through 6, by July 1, 2026 to 22a content area test that contains testing elements that cover 23bilingualism, biliteracy, oral language development, 24foundational literacy skills, and developmentally appropriate 25higher-order comprehension and on which a valid and reliable 26language and literacy subscore can be determined. The State   HB3170- 23 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1Board shall base its rules concerning the passing subscore on 2the language and literacy portion of the test on the 3recommended cut-score determined in the formal 4standard-setting process. Candidates need not achieve a 5particular subscore in the area of language and literacy. The 6State Board shall aggregate and publish the number of 7candidates in each preparation program who take the test and 8the number who pass the language and literacy portion.9    (e) (Blank).10    (f) Beginning on August 4, 2023 (the effective date of 11Public Act 103-488) through August 31, 2025, no candidate 12completing a teacher preparation program in this State or 13candidate subject to Section 21B-35 of this Code is required 14to pass a teacher performance assessment. Except as otherwise 15provided in this Article, beginning on September 1, 2015 until 16August 4, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 103-488) and 17beginning again on July 1, 2028 September 1, 2025, all 18candidates completing teacher preparation programs in this 19State and all candidates subject to Section 21B-35 of this 20Code are required to pass a teacher performance assessment 21approved by the State Board of Education, in consultation with 22the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board. A 23candidate may not be required to submit test materials by 24video submission. Subject to appropriation, an individual who 25holds a Professional Educator License and is employed for a 26minimum of one school year by a school district designated as   HB3170- 24 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1Tier 1 under Section 18-8.15 may, after application to the 2State Board, receive from the State Board a refund for any 3costs associated with completing the teacher performance 4assessment under this subsection. 5    (f-5) The Teacher Performance Assessment Task Force is 6created to evaluate potential performance-based and objective 7teacher performance assessment systems for implementation 8across all educator preparation programs in this State, with 9the intention of ensuring consistency across programs and 10supporting a thoughtful and well-rounded licensure system. 11Members appointed to the Task Force must reflect the racial, 12ethnic, and geographic diversity of this State. The Task Force 13shall consist of all of the following members:14        (1) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 15    President of the Senate.16        (2) One member of the Senate, appointed by the 17    Minority Leader of the Senate.18        (3) One member of the House of Representatives, 19    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.20        (4) One member of the House of Representatives, 21    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 22    Representatives.23        (5) One member who represents a statewide professional 24    teachers' organization, appointed by the State 25    Superintendent of Education.26        (6) One member who represents a different statewide   HB3170- 25 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    professional teachers' organization, appointed by the 2    State Superintendent of Education.3        (7) One member from a statewide organization 4    representing school principals, appointed by the State 5    Superintendent of Education.6        (8) One member from a statewide organization 7    representing regional superintendents of schools, 8    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.9        (9) One member from a statewide organization 10    representing school administrators, appointed by the State 11    Superintendent of Education.12        (10) One member representing a school district 13    organized under Article 34 of this Code, appointed by the 14    State Superintendent of Education.15        (11) One member of an association representing rural 16    and small schools, appointed by the State Superintendent 17    of Education.18        (12) One member representing a suburban school 19    district, appointed by the State Superintendent of 20    Education.21        (13) One member from a statewide organization 22    representing school districts in the southern suburbs of 23    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 24    of Education.25        (14) One member from a statewide organization 26    representing large unit school districts, appointed by the   HB3170- 26 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    State Superintendent of Education.2        (15) One member from a statewide organization 3    representing school districts in the collar counties of 4    the City of Chicago, appointed by the State Superintendent 5    of Education.6        (16) Three members, each representing a different 7    public university in this State and each a current member 8    of the faculty of an approved educator preparation 9    program, appointed by the State Superintendent of 10    Education.11        (17) Three members, each representing a different 12    4-year nonpublic university or college in this State and 13    each a current member of the faculty of an approved 14    educator preparation program, appointed by the State 15    Superintendent of Education.16        (18) One member of the Board of Higher Education, 17    appointed by the State Superintendent of Education.18        (19) One member representing a statewide policy 19    organization advocating on behalf of multilingual students 20    and families, appointed by the State Superintendent of 21    Education.22        (20) One member representing a statewide organization 23    focused on research-based education policy to support a 24    school system that prepares all students for college, a 25    career, and democratic citizenship, appointed by the State 26    Superintendent of Education.  HB3170- 27 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        (21) Two members representing an early childhood 2    advocacy organization, appointed by the State 3    Superintendent of Education.4        (22) One member representing a statewide organization 5    that partners with educator preparation programs and 6    school districts to support the growth and development of 7    preservice teachers, appointed by the State Superintendent 8    of Education. 9        (23) One member representing a statewide organization 10    that advocates for educational equity and racial justice 11    in schools, appointed by the State Superintendent of 12    Education.13        (24) One member representing a statewide organization 14    that represents school boards, appointed by the State 15    Superintendent of Education.16        (25) One member who has, within the last 5 years, 17    served as a cooperating teacher, appointed by the State 18    Superintendent of Education. 19    Members of the Task Force shall serve without 20compensation. The Task Force shall first meet at the call of 21the State Superintendent of Education, and each subsequent 22meeting shall be called by the chairperson of the Task Force, 23who shall be designated by the State Superintendent of 24Education. The State Board of Education shall provide 25administrative and other support to the Task Force.26    On or before October 31, 2024, the Task Force shall report   HB3170- 28 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1on its work, including recommendations on a teacher 2performance assessment system in this State, to the State 3Board of Education and the General Assembly. The Task Force is 4dissolved upon submission of this report. 5    (g) The content area knowledge test and the teacher 6performance assessment shall be the tests that from time to 7time are designated by the State Board of Education, in 8consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 9Board, and may be tests prepared by an educational testing 10organization or tests designed by the State Board of 11Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 12and Licensure Board. The test of content area knowledge shall 13assess content knowledge in a specific subject field. The 14tests must be designed to be racially neutral to ensure that no 15person taking the tests is discriminated against on the basis 16of race, color, national origin, or other factors unrelated to 17the person's ability to perform as a licensed employee. The 18score required to pass the tests shall be fixed by the State 19Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 20Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of 21Education's rules for scoring the content area knowledge test 22may include scoring and retaking of each test section 23separately and independently. The tests shall be administered 24not fewer than 3 times a year at such time and place as may be 25designated by the State Board of Education, in consultation 26with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.   HB3170- 29 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    The State Board shall implement a test or tests to assess 2the speaking, reading, writing, and grammar skills of 3applicants for an endorsement or a license issued under 4subdivision (G) of paragraph (2) of Section 21B-20 of this 5Code in the English language and in the language of the 6transitional bilingual education program requested by the 7applicant. 8    (h) Except as provided in Section 34-6 of this Code, the 9provisions of this Section shall apply equally in any school 10district subject to Article 34 of this Code.11    (i) The rules developed to implement and enforce the 12testing requirements under this Section shall include, without 13limitation, provisions governing test selection, test 14validation, and determination of a passing score, 15administration of the tests, frequency of administration, 16applicant fees, frequency of applicants taking the tests, the 17years for which a score is valid, and appropriate special 18accommodations. The State Board of Education shall develop 19such rules as may be needed to ensure uniformity from year to 20year in the level of difficulty for each form of an assessment.21(Source: P.A. 102-301, eff. 8-26-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23; 22103-488, eff. 8-4-23; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-780, eff. 238-2-24; 103-811, eff. 8-9-24; 103-846, eff. 8-9-24.) 24    (105 ILCS 5/21B-32 new)25    Sec. 21B-32. Teacher Performance Assessment Advisory   HB3170- 30 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1Committee. 2    (a) The State Superintendent of Education shall establish 3a Teacher Performance Assessment Advisory Committee of no more 4than 15 members to aid in operationalizing and creating a 5pilot, State-developed, teacher performance assessment (TPA). 6The Committee shall, at a minimum, do all of the following:7        (1) Create materials and resources that are necessary 8    for the implementation of a TPA.9        (2) Identify sources of evidence required for the 10    evaluation of a TPA.11        (3) Monitor a multiyear pilot program to create a 12    State-developed TPA and make recommendations informed by 13    collected data of modifications to the TPA.14        (4) Support the State Board of Education in developing 15    rubrics and the resources necessary for the completion and 16    evaluation of the valid and reliable assessment, creating 17    the required training for evaluators of the assessment, 18    implementing the multiyear pilot program, including, but 19    not limited to, establishing criteria and sufficient 20    evidence for successful completion of the TPA, and 21    recommending refinements to the assessment as needed.22    (b) The membership of the Committee shall include 23individuals with expertise in assessment development, 24including statisticians and psychometricians, and individuals 25with expertise in the elements of effective teaching, 26including current Illinois educators. The membership of the   HB3170- 31 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1Committee shall represent the ethnic, racial, and geographic 2diversity of this State and include expertise across early 3childhood, elementary, middle, and high school settings, as 4well as expertise in the instruction of English learners and 5students with disabilities.6    (c) The State Board of Education shall provide 7administrative support to the Committee.8    (d) Members of the Committee shall serve without 9compensation, but may be reimbursed for reasonable and 10necessary expenses, including travel, from funds appropriated 11to the State Board of Education for that purpose, subject to 12the rules of the appropriate travel control board.13    (e) The first meeting of the Committee shall be at the call 14of the State Superintendent, and each subsequent meeting shall 15be at the call of the chairperson, who shall be designated by 16the State Superintendent. The Committee shall hold regular 17meetings at least quarterly and such other meetings as 18determined by its chairperson.19    (f) Data from completed pilot TPAs from institutions of 20higher education with approved educator preparation programs 21shall be shared with the Committee, which shall, as 22applicable, provide an annual recommendation on the use of the 23TPA to the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board and 24the State Board of Education.25    (g) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 26Committee, may adopt such rules as may be necessary for the   HB3170- 32 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1administration of this Section.2    (h) This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028. 3    (105 ILCS 5/21B-35)4    Sec. 21B-35. Minimum requirements for educators trained in 5other states or countries.6    (a) Any applicant who has not been entitled by an 7Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 8institution of higher education applying for a Professional 9Educator License endorsed in a teaching field or school 10support personnel area must meet the following requirements:11        (1) the applicant must:12            (A) hold a comparable and valid educator license 13        or certificate, as defined by rule, with similar grade 14        level and content area credentials from another state, 15        with the State Board of Education having the authority 16        to determine what constitutes similar grade level and 17        content area credentials from another state;18            (B) have a bachelor's degree from a regionally 19        accredited institution of higher education; and20            (C) (blank); and or 21            (D) have successfully passed all State 22        examinations required by Section 21B-30; or23        (2) the applicant must:24            (A) have completed a state-approved program for 25        the licensure area sought. Until July 1, 2027 or the   HB3170- 33 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        date that the revised test for a particular content 2        area is implemented, whichever is later, the program 3        must include , including coursework concerning (i) 4        methods of instruction of the exceptional child, (ii) 5        methods of reading that align with all applicable 6        standards set forth in Part 23 of Title 23 of the 7        Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 8        content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 9        English learners;10            (B) have a bachelor's degree from a regionally 11        accredited institution of higher education;12            (C) have successfully met all Illinois examination 13        requirements, except that:14                (i) (blank);15                (ii) an applicant who has successfully 16            completed a test of content, as defined by rules, 17            at the time of initial licensure in another state 18            is not required to complete a test of content; and19                (iii) an applicant for a teaching endorsement 20            who has successfully completed an evidence-based 21            assessment of teacher effectiveness, as defined by 22            rules, at the time of initial licensure in another 23            state is not required to complete an 24            evidence-based assessment of teacher 25            effectiveness; and26            (D) for an applicant for a teaching endorsement,   HB3170- 34 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        have completed student teaching or an equivalent 2        experience or, for an applicant for a school service 3        personnel endorsement, have completed an internship or 4        an equivalent experience.5    (b) In order to receive a Professional Educator License 6endorsed in a teaching field or school support personnel area, 7applicants trained in another country must meet all of the 8following requirements:9        (1) Have completed a comparable education program in 10    another country.11        (2) Have had transcripts evaluated by an evaluation 12    service approved by the State Superintendent of Education.13        (3) Have a degree comparable to a degree from a 14    regionally accredited institution of higher education.15        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 16    test for a particular content area is implemented, 17    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 18    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 19    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with 20    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 21    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 22    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 23    English learners. Applicants seeking a school support 24    personnel endorsement are exempt from this paragraph (4). 25        (5) (Blank).26        (6) (Blank).  HB3170- 35 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1        (7) Have successfully met all State licensure 2    examination requirements. Applicants who have successfully 3    completed a test of content, as defined by rules, at the 4    time of initial licensure in another country shall not be 5    required to complete a test of content. Applicants for a 6    teaching endorsement who have successfully completed an 7    evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness, as 8    defined by rules, at the time of initial licensure in 9    another country shall not be required to complete an 10    evidence-based assessment of teacher effectiveness. 11        (8) Have completed student teaching or an equivalent 12    experience.13        (9) (Blank). 14    (b-5) All applicants who have not been entitled by an 15Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 16institution of higher education and applicants trained in 17another country applying for a Professional Educator License 18endorsed for principal or superintendent must hold a master's 19degree from a regionally accredited institution of higher 20education and hold a comparable and valid educator license or 21certificate with similar grade level and subject matter 22credentials, with the State Board of Education having the 23authority to determine what constitutes similar grade level 24and subject matter credentials from another state, or must 25meet all of the following requirements:26        (1) Have completed an educator preparation program   HB3170- 36 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    approved by another state or comparable educator program 2    in another country leading to the receipt of a license or 3    certificate for the Illinois endorsement sought.4        (2) Have successfully met all State licensure 5    examination requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of 6    this Code. Applicants who have successfully completed a 7    test of content, as defined by rules, at the time of 8    initial licensure in another state or country shall not be 9    required to complete a test of content. 10        (2.5) Have completed an internship, as defined by 11    rule. 12        (3) (Blank).13        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 14    test for a particular content area is implemented, 15    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 16    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 17    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with 18    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 19    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the 20    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 21    English learners.22        (4.5) (Blank). 23        (5) Have completed a master's degree.24        (6) Have successfully completed teaching, school 25    support, or administrative experience as defined by rule. 26    (b-7) All applicants who have not been entitled by an   HB3170- 37 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 2institution of higher education applying for a Professional 3Educator License endorsed for Director of Special Education 4must hold a master's degree from a regionally accredited 5institution of higher education and must hold a comparable and 6valid educator license or certificate with similar grade level 7and subject matter credentials, with the State Board of 8Education having the authority to determine what constitutes 9similar grade level and subject matter credentials from 10another state, or must meet all of the following requirements:11        (1) Have completed a master's degree.12        (2) Have 2 years of full-time experience providing 13    special education services.14        (3) Have successfully completed all examination 15    requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code. 16    Applicants who have successfully completed a test of 17    content, as identified by rules, at the time of initial 18    licensure in another state or country shall not be 19    required to complete a test of content. 20        (4) Until July 1, 2027 or the date that the revised 21    test for a particular content area is implemented, 22    whichever is later, have Have completed coursework aligned 23    to standards concerning (i) methods of instruction of the 24    exceptional child, (ii) methods of reading that align with 25    all applicable standards set forth in Part 26 of Title 23 26    of the Illinois Administrative Code and reading in the   HB3170- 38 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    content area, and (iii) instructional strategies for 2    English learners.3    (b-10) All applicants who have not been entitled by an 4Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an Illinois 5institution of higher education applying for a Professional 6Educator License endorsed for chief school business official 7must hold a master's degree from a regionally accredited 8institution of higher education and must hold a comparable and 9valid educator license or certificate with similar grade level 10and subject matter credentials, with the State Board of 11Education having the authority to determine what constitutes 12similar grade level and subject matter credentials from 13another state, or must meet all of the following requirements:14        (1) Have completed a master's degree in school 15    business management, finance, or accounting.16        (2) Have successfully completed an internship in 17    school business management or have 2 years of experience 18    as a school business administrator.19        (3) Have successfully met all State examination 20    requirements, as required by Section 21B-30 of this Code. 21    Applicants who have successfully completed a test of 22    content, as identified by rules, at the time of initial 23    licensure in another state or country shall not be 24    required to complete a test of content. 25        (4) (Blank). Have completed modules aligned to 26    standards concerning methods of instruction of the   HB3170- 39 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    exceptional child, methods of reading and reading in the 2    content area, and instructional strategies for English 3    learners.4    (c) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 5State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may adopt such 6rules as may be necessary to implement this Section.7(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21; 103-402, eff. 7-28-23.) 8    (105 ILCS 5/21B-47 new)9    Sec. 21B-47. Paraprofessional to Teacher Pathway Program. 10    (a) There is established the Paraprofessional Teacher 11Pathway Program. The Paraprofessional Teacher Pathway Program 12may be offered by a recognized institution approved to offer 13educator preparation programs by the State Board of Education, 14in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 15Licensure Board. The Program shall provide an expedited 16pathway for paraprofessionals to earn a Professional Educator 17License in a specific content area, including, but not limited 18to, elementary education or special education. The Program 19shall create a partnership with the institution and other 20entities, as defined by rule by the State Board of Education.21    (b) The Program shall meet all of the following criteria: 22        (1) The Program shall include a program of study with 23    coursework in instructional planning, instructional 24    strategies, including special education, reading, and 25    English language learning, classroom management, and the   HB3170- 40 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    assessment of students and use of data to drive 2    instruction. 3        (2) The Program shall meet the criteria of 23 Ill. 4    Adm. Code 25.25(a)(2)(A) relative to required coursework. 5        (3) The Program shall include student teaching or an 6    equivalent experience. 7    (c) An individual shall meet all of the following 8requirements for entry into the Program: 9        (1) The individual holds a valid Educator License with 10    Stipulations with a paraprofessional educator endorsement 11    or a valid paraprofessional approval. 12        (2) The individual is employed as a paraprofessional 13    providing service to one or more students within the 14    licensure content area sought, such as elementary 15    education or special education. 16        (3) The individual has worked at least 2 years as a 17    paraprofessional. 18        (4) The individual has completed at least 60 semester 19    hours of coursework from a regionally accredited 20    institution of higher education.21    (d) The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 22necessary to implement this Section, including, but not 23limited to, program proposal requirements. 24    (105 ILCS 5/21B-105)25    Sec. 21B-105. Granting of recognition; regional   HB3170- 41 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1accreditation; definitions.2    (a) "Recognized", as used in this Article in connection 3with the word "school" or "institution", means such college, 4university, or for-profit or not-for-profit entity that meets 5requirements set by the State Board of Education, in 6consultation with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure 7Board. Application for recognition of the school or 8institution as an educator preparation institution must be 9made to the State Board of Education. The State Board of 10Education, in consultation with the State Educator Preparation 11and Licensure Board, shall set the criteria by which the 12school or institution is to be judged and, through the 13secretary of the State Board, arrange for an official 14inspection and shall grant recognition of such school or 15institution as may meet the required standards. If the 16standards include requirements with regard to education in 17acquiring skills in working with culturally distinctive 18students, as defined by the State Board of Education, then the 19rules of the State Board of Education shall include the 20criteria used to evaluate compliance with this requirement. No 21school or institution may make assignments of student teachers 22or teachers for practice teaching so as to promote segregation 23on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, or national 24origin.25    Any for-profit or not-for-profit entity must also be 26approved by the Board of Higher Education.   HB3170- 42 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1    All recommendations or entitlements for educator licensure 2shall be made by a recognized institution operating a program 3of preparation for the license that is approved by the State 4Board of Education, in consultation with the State Educator 5Preparation and Licensure Board. The State Board of Education, 6in consultation with the State Educator Preparation and 7Licensure Board, shall have the power to define a major or 8minor when used as a basis for recognition and licensure 9purposes.10    (b) "Regionally accredited", or "accredited", as used in 11this Article in connection with a university or institution, 12means an institution of higher education accredited by the 13North Central Association or other comparable regional 14accrediting association.15    (c) An institution of higher education approved to offer 16educator preparation programs in this State may, upon the 17request of a public community college in this State, enter 18into a partnership agreement with the community college to 19offer an approved educator preparation program leading to 20educator licensure for individuals who already hold a 21bachelor's degree. The partnership must be approved by the 22State Board of Education, in consultation with the State 23Educator Preparation and Licensure Board.24    The State Board of Education shall adopt rules for the 25requirements of a partnership agreement under this subsection. 26(Source: P.A. 100-596, eff. 7-1-18.)  HB3170- 43 -LRB104 10292 LNS 20366 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    105 ILCS 5/21B-104    105 ILCS 5/21B-205    105 ILCS 5/21B-306    105 ILCS 5/21B-32 new7    105 ILCS 5/21B-358    105 ILCS 5/21B-47 new9    105 ILCS 5/21B-105